District of Columbia statutes.
42-506

Estates classified; possession; expectancy.

Estates are either in possession or in expectancy.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1016

History

1981 Ed., § 45-206.
1973 Ed., § 45-806.

Prior Codifications